Utah statutes.
59-12-1903.   Imposition of tax -- Base -- Rate -- Expenditure of revenues
collected from the tax -- Administration, collection, and enforcement of tax
by commission -- Administrative fee -- Enactment or repeal of tax --
Annexation -- Notice.
(1) (a)  Subject to the other provisions of this section and except as
provided in Subsection (2), the following may impose a sales and use tax under
this part:
(i)  if, on April 1, 2009, a county legislative body of a county of the second
class imposes a sales and use tax under this part, the county legislative body
of the county of the second class may impose the sales and use tax on the
transactions:
(A)  described in Subsection 59-12-103(1); and
(B)  within the county, including the cities and towns within the county; or
(ii)  if, on April 1, 2009, a county legislative body of a county of the
second class does not impose a sales and use tax under this part:
(A)  a city legislative body of a city within the county of the second class
may impose a sales and use tax under this part on the transactions described
in Subsection 59-12-103(1) within that city;
(B)  a town legislative body of a town within the county of the second class
may impose a sales and use tax under this part on the transactions described
in Subsection 59-12-103(1) within that town; and
(C)  the county legislative body of the county of the second class may impose
a sales and use tax on the transactions described in Subsection 59-12-103(1):
(I)  within the county, including the cities and towns within the county, if
on the date the county legislative body provides the notice described in
Subsection (7)(a) to the commission stating that the county will enact a tax
under this part, no city or town within that county:
(Aa)  imposes a tax under this part; or
(Bb)  has provided the notice described in Subsection (7)(a) to the commission
stating that the city or town will enact a tax under this part; or
(II)  within the county, except for within a city or town within that county,
if, on the date the county legislative body provides the notice described in
Subsection (7)(a) to the commission stating that the county will enact a tax
under this part, that city or town:
(Aa)  imposes a tax under this part; or
(Bb)  has provided the notice described in Subsection (7)(a) to the commission
stating that the city or town will enact a tax under this part.
(b)  For purposes of Subsection (1)(a), a county, city, or town legislative
body that imposes a tax under this part may impose the tax at a rate of:
(i)  .10%, to be:
(A)  as determined by the county, city, or town legislative body, deposited as
provided in Subsection (4)(c)(i) into the County of the Second Class State
Highway Projects Fund created by Section 72-2-121.2 and expended as provided
in Section 72-2-121.2;
(B)  as determined by the county, city, or town legislative body, expended for
a project or service relating to an airport facility for the portion of the
project or service that is performed within the county, city, or town within
which the tax is imposed:
(I)  for a county legislative body that imposes the tax, if that airport
facility is part of the regional transportation plan of the area metropolitan
planning organization if a metropolitan planning organization exists for the
area; or
(II)  for a city or town legislative body that imposes the tax, if:
(Aa)  that city or town owns or operates the airport facility; and
(Bb)  an airline is headquartered in that city or town; or
(C)  as determined by the county, city, or town legislative body, deposited or
expended for a combination of Subsections (1)(b)(i)(A) and (B); or
(ii)  subject to Subsection (1)(c), .25%, to be expended as follows:
(A)  .10% to be deposited as provided in Subsection (4)(c)(i) into the County
of the Second Class State Highway Projects Fund created by Section 72-2-121.2
and expended as provided in Section 72-2-121.2;
(B)  .05%, to be deposited as provided in Subsection (4)(c)(ii) into the Local
Transportation Corridor Preservation Fund created by Section 72-2-117.5 and
expended and distributed in accordance with Section 72-2-117.5; and
(C)  as determined by the county, city, or town legislative body, .10% to be:
(I)  deposited as provided in Subsection (4)(c)(i) into the County of the
Second Class State Highway Projects Fund created by Section 72-2-121.2 and
expended as provided in Section 72-2-121.2;
(II)  expended for:
(Aa)  a state highway designated under Title 72, Chapter 4, Part 1,
Designation of State Highways Act;
(Bb)  a local highway of regional significance; or
(Cc)  a combination of Subsections (1)(b)(ii)(C)(II)(Aa) and (Bb);
(III)  expended for a project or service relating to a system for public
transit for the portion of the project or service that is performed within the
county, city, or town within which the tax is imposed;
(IV)  expended for a project or service relating to a fixed guideway for the
portion of the project or service that is performed within the county, city,
or town within which the tax is imposed;
(V)  expended for a project or service relating to an airport facility for the
portion of the project or service that is performed within the county, city,
or town within which the tax is imposed:
(Aa)  for a county legislative body that imposes the tax, if that airport
facility is part of the regional transportation plan of the area metropolitan
planning organization if a metropolitan planning organization exists for the
area; or
(Bb)  for a city or town legislative body that imposes the tax, if:
(Ii)  that city or town owns or operates the airport facility; and
(IIii)  an airline is headquartered in that city or town; or
(VI)  deposited or expended for a combination of Subsections (1)(b)(ii)(C)(I)
through (V).
(c) (i)  Subject to the other provisions of this Subsection (1)(c), a city or
town within which a tax is imposed at the tax rate described in Subsection
(1)(b)(ii) may:
(A)  expend the revenues in accordance with Subsection (1)(b)(ii); or
(B)  expend the revenues in accordance with Subsections (1)(c)(ii) through
(iv) if:
(I)  that city or town owns or operates an airport facility; and
(II)  an airline is headquartered in that city or town.
(ii)  If a city or town within which a tax is imposed at the tax rate
described in Subsection (1)(b)(ii) owns or operates an airport facility at
which an airline is headquartered, the city or town legislative body may
expend the revenues collected from a tax rate of greater than .10% but not to
exceed the revenues collected from a tax rate of .25% for:
(A)  a project or service relating to the airport facility; and
(B)  the portion of the project or service that is performed within the city
or town imposing the tax.
(iii)  If a city or town legislative body described in Subsection (1)(c)(ii)
determines to expend the revenues collected from a tax rate of greater than
.10% but not to exceed the revenues collected from a tax rate of .25% for a
project or service relating to an airport facility as allowed by Subsection
(1)(c)(ii), any remaining revenues that are collected from the tax imposed at
the tax rate described in Subsection (1)(b)(ii) that are not expended for the
project or service relating to an airport facility as allowed by Subsection
(1)(c)(ii) shall be expended as follows:
(A)  75% of the remaining revenues shall be deposited as provided in
Subsection (4)(d) into the County of the Second Class State Highway Projects
Fund created by Section 72-2-121.2 and expended as provided in Section
72-2-121.2; and
(B)  25% of the remaining revenues shall be deposited as provided in
Subsection (4)(d) into the Local Transportation Corridor Preservation Fund
created by Section 72-2-117.5 and expended and distributed in accordance with
Section 72-2-117.5.
(iv)  A city or town legislative body that expends the revenues collected from
a tax imposed at the tax rate described in Subsection (1)(b)(ii) in accordance
with Subsections (1)(c)(ii) and (iii):
(A)  shall, on or before the date the city or town legislative body provides
the notice described in Subsection (7)(a) to the commission stating that the
city or town will enact a tax under this part:
(I)  determine the tax rate:
(Aa)  the collections from which the city or town legislative body will expend
for a project or service relating to an airport facility as allowed by
Subsection (1)(c)(ii); and
(Bb)  at a percentage that is greater than .10% but does not exceed .25%; and
(II)  notify the commission in writing of the tax rate the city or town
legislative body determines in accordance with Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(A)(I);
(B)  shall, on or before the April 1 immediately following the date the city
or town legislative body provides the notice described in Subsection
(1)(c)(iv)(A) to the commission:
(I)  determine the tax rate:
(Aa)  the collections from which the city or town legislative body will expend
for a project or service relating to an airport facility as allowed by
Subsection (1)(c)(ii); and
(Bb)  at a percentage that is greater than .10% but does not exceed .25%; and
(II)  notify the commission in writing of the tax rate the city or town
legislative body determines in accordance with Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(B)(I);
(C)  shall, on or before April 1 of each year after the April 1 described in
Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(B):
(I)  determine the tax rate:
(Aa)  the collections from which the city or town legislative body will expend
for a project or service relating to an airport facility as allowed by
Subsection (1)(c)(ii); and
(Bb)  at a percentage that is greater than .10% but does not exceed .25%; and
(II)  notify the commission in writing of the tax rate the city or town
legislative body determines in accordance with Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(C)(I);
and
(D)  may not change the tax rate the city or town legislative body determines
in accordance with Subsections (1)(c)(iv)(A) through (C) more frequently than
as prescribed by Subsections (1)(c)(iv)(A) through (C).
(d)  If a county legislative body imposes a tax under this part, regardless of
whether the tax under this part is imposed within all of the cities and towns
within the county, the county legislative body may not impose a tax under Part
17, County Option Sales and Use Tax for Transportation Act.
(e)  For purposes of this Subsection (1), the location of a transaction shall
be determined in accordance with Sections 59-12-211 through 59-12-215.
(2) (a)  A county, city, or town legislative body may not impose a tax under
this part on:
(i)  the sales and uses described in Section 59-12-104 to the extent the sales
and uses are exempt from taxation under Section 59-12-104; or
(ii)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), amounts paid or charged for
food and food ingredients.
(b)  A county, city, or town legislative body imposing a tax under this part
shall impose the tax on amounts paid or charged for food and food ingredients
if the food and food ingredients are sold as part of a bundled transaction
attributable to food and food ingredients and tangible personal property other
than food and food ingredients.
(3) (a)  To impose a tax under this part, a county, city, or town legislative
body shall obtain approval from a majority of the members of the county, city,
or town legislative body.
(b)  Before a city or town legislative body may impose a tax under this part,
the city or town legislative body shall provide a copy of the notice described
in Subsection (7)(a) that the city or town legislative body provides to the
commission:
(i)  to the county legislative body within which the city or town is located;
and
(ii)  at the same time as the city or town legislative body provides the
notice to the commission.
(4) (a)  Subject to Subsections (4)(b) through (f) and except as provided in
Subsection (6), the commission shall transmit revenues collected within a
county, city, or town from a tax under this part that will be expended for a
purpose described in Subsection (1)(b)(i)(B) or Subsections (1)(b)(ii)(C)(II)
through (V):
(i)  to the county, city, or town legislative body;
(ii)  monthly; and
(iii)  by electronic funds transfer.
(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (6), the commission shall transfer the
revenues described in Subsection (4)(a) directly to a public transit district
organized under Title 17B, Chapter 2a, Part 8, Public Transit District Act, if
the county, city, or town legislative body:
(i)  provides written notice to the commission requesting the transfer; and
(ii)  designates the public transit district to which the county, city, or
town legislative body requests the commission to transfer the revenues
described in Subsection (4)(a).
(c)  Except as provided in Subsection (4)(d) or (6), the commission shall
deposit revenues collected within a county, city, or town from a tax under
this part that:
(i)  are required to be expended for a purpose described in Subsection
(1)(b)(ii)(A) into the County of the Second Class State Highway Projects Fund
created by Section 72-2-121.2;
(ii)  are required to be expended for a purpose described in Subsection
(1)(b)(ii)(B) into the Local Transportation Corridor Preservation Fund created
by Section 72-2-117.5; or
(iii)  a county, city, or town legislative body determines to expend for a
purpose described in Subsection (1)(b)(i)(A) or (1)(b)(ii)(C)(I) into the
County of the Second Class State Highway Projects Fund created by Section
72-2-121.2 if the county, city, or town legislative body provides written
notice to the commission requesting the deposit.
(d)  Subject to Subsection (4)(e) or (f), if a city or town legislative body
provides notice to the commission in accordance with Subsection (1)(c)(iv),
the commission shall:
(i)  transmit the revenues collected from the tax rate stated on the notice to
the city or town legislative body:
(A)  monthly; and
(B)  by electronic funds transfer; and
(ii)  deposit any remaining revenues described in Subsection (1)(c)(iii) in
accordance with Subsection (1)(c)(iii).
(e) (i)  If a city or town legislative body provides the notice described in
Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(A) to the commission, the commission shall transmit or
deposit the revenues collected from the tax:
(A)  in accordance with Subsection (4)(d);
(B)  beginning on the date the city or town legislative body enacts the tax;
and
(C)  ending on the earlier of:
(I)  the June 30 immediately following the date the city or town legislative
body provides the notice described in Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(B) to the
commission; or
(II)  the date the city or town legislative body repeals the tax.
(ii)  If a city or town legislative body provides the notice described in
Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(B) or (C) to the commission, the commission shall
transmit or deposit the revenues collected from the tax:
(A)  in accordance with Subsection (4)(d);
(B)  beginning on the July 1 immediately following the date the city or town
legislative body provides the notice described in Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(B) or
(C) to the commission; and
(C)  ending on the earlier of:
(I)  the June 30 of the year after the date the city or town legislative body
provides the notice described in Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(B) or (C) to the
commission; or
(II)  the date the city or town legislative body repeals the tax.
(f) (i)  If a city or town legislative body that is required to provide the
notice described in Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(A) does not provide the notice
described in Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(A) to the commission on or before the date
required by Subsection (1)(c)(iv) for providing the notice, the commission
shall transmit, transfer, or deposit the revenues collected from the tax
within the city or town in accordance with Subsections (4)(a) through (c).
(ii)  If a city or town legislative body that is required to provide the
notice described in Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(B) or (C) does not provide the
notice described in Subsection (1)(c)(iv)(B) or (C) to the commission on or
before the date required by Subsection (1)(c)(iv) for providing the notice,
the commission shall transmit or deposit the revenues collected from the tax
within the city or town in accordance with:
(A)  Subsection (4)(d); and
(B)  the most recent notice the commission received from the city or town
legislative body under Subsection (1)(c)(iv).
(5) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (5)(b), the commission shall
administer, collect, and enforce a tax under this part in accordance with:
(i)  the same procedures used to administer, collect, and enforce the tax
under:
(A)  Part 1, Tax Collection; or
(B)  Part 2, Local Sales and Use Tax Act; and
(ii)  Chapter 1, General Taxation Policies.
(b)  A tax under this part is not subject to Subsections 59-12-205(2) through
(6).
(6) (a)  The commission may retain an amount of tax collected under this part
of not to exceed the lesser of:
(i)  1.50%; or
(ii)  an amount equal to the cost to the commission of administering this
part.
(b)  Any amount the commission retains under Subsection (6)(a) shall be:
(i)  deposited into the Sales and Use Tax Administrative Fees Account; and
(ii)  used as provided in Subsection 59-12-206(2).
(7) (a) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (7)(b) or (c), if, on or after
January 1, 2009, a county, city, or town enacts or repeals a tax or changes
the rate of a tax under this part, the enactment, repeal, or change shall take
effect:
(A)  on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(B)  after a 90-day period beginning on the date the commission receives
notice meeting the requirements of Subsection (7)(a)(ii) from the county,
city, or town.
(ii)  The notice described in Subsection (7)(a)(i)(B) shall state:
(A)  that the county, city, or town will enact, repeal, or change the rate of
a tax under this part;
(B)  the statutory authority for the tax described in Subsection
(7)(a)(ii)(A);
(C)  the effective date of the tax described in Subsection (7)(a)(ii)(A); and
(D)  if the county, city, or town enacts the tax or changes the rate of the
tax described in Subsection (7)(a)(ii)(A), the rate of the tax.
(b) (i)  If the billing period for a transaction begins before the effective
date of the enactment of the tax or the tax rate increase under Subsection
(1), the enactment of a tax or a tax rate increase shall take effect on the
first day of the first billing period that begins after the effective date of
the enactment of the tax or the tax rate increase.
(ii)  If the billing period for a transaction begins before the effective date
of the repeal of the tax or the tax rate decrease imposed under Subsection
(1), the repeal of a tax or a tax rate decrease shall take effect on the first
day of the last billing period that began before the effective date of the
repeal of the tax or the tax rate decrease.
(c) (i)  If a tax due under this part on a catalogue sale is computed on the
basis of sales and use tax rates published in the catalogue, an enactment,
repeal, or change in the rate of a tax described in Subsection (7)(a)(i) takes
effect:
(A)  on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(B)  beginning 60 days after the effective date of the enactment, repeal, or
change in the rate of the tax under Subsection (7)(a)(i).
(ii)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may by rule define the term "catalogue sale."
(d) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (7)(e) or (f), if, for an annexation
that occurs on or after January 1, 2009, the annexation will result in the
enactment, repeal, or change in the rate of a tax under this part for an
annexing area, the enactment, repeal, or change shall take effect:
(A)  on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(B)  after a 90-day period beginning on the date the commission receives
notice meeting the requirements of Subsection (7)(d)(ii) from the county,
city, or town that annexes the annexing area.
(ii)  The notice described in Subsection (7)(d)(i)(B) shall state:
(A)  that the annexation described in Subsection (7)(d)(i)(B) will result in
an enactment, repeal, or change in the rate of a tax under this part for the
annexing area;
(B)  the statutory authority for the tax described in Subsection
(7)(d)(ii)(A);
(C)  the effective date of the tax described in Subsection (7)(d)(ii)(A); and
(D)  if the county, city, or town enacts the tax or changes the rate of the
tax described in Subsection (7)(d)(ii)(A), the rate of the tax.
(e) (i)  If the billing period for a transaction begins before the effective
date of the enactment of the tax or a tax rate increase under Subsection (1),
the enactment of a tax or a tax rate increase shall take effect on the first
day of the first billing period that begins after the effective date of the
enactment of the tax or the tax rate increase.
(ii)  If the billing period for a transaction begins before the effective date
of the repeal of the tax or the tax rate decrease imposed under Subsection
(1), the repeal of a tax or a tax rate decrease shall take effect on the first
day of the last billing period that began before the effective date of the
repeal of the tax or the tax rate decrease.
(f) (i)  If a tax due under this part on a catalogue sale is computed on the
basis of sales and use tax rates published in the catalogue, an enactment,
repeal, or change in the rate of a tax described in Subsection (7)(d)(i) takes
effect:
(A)  on the first day of a calendar quarter; and
(B)  beginning 60 days after the effective date of the enactment, repeal, or
change in the rate under Subsection (7)(d)(i).
(ii)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission may by rule define the term "catalogue sale."
